Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-220
Revoke, defined.

Revoke shall mean to permanently void and recall all rights and privileges of an organization or a person to obtain a license or a permit.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 13;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 17;

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-140.09;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 21;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 22.